California statutes. Public Resources Code
(B) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for acquisition of land within and adjacent to Anza-Borrego Desert State Park.

(C) Nineteen
 million dollars ($19,000,000) for acquisition of land in the Palm Canyon and Andreas Canyon region near Palm Springs for a park for the preservation of Indian heritage and of native palms.

(D) Seven million dollars ($7,000,000) for acquisition of lands in accordance with the general plan for the Chino Hills State Park, including the lands north of Highway 142.

(E) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for acquisition of land for additions to the Santa Susana Mountain Project to preserve historic and scenic sites, for hiking and equestrian trails, or for wildlife habitat and migration routes; provided that all acquisitions shall be located within the Rim of the Valley Corridor as defined in Section 33105.5 within the Simi Hills or Santa Susana Mountains in Los Angeles and Ventura Counties.

(F) Two million dollars
 ($2,000,000) for acquisitions within and adjacent to Big Basin Redwoods State Park and Castle Rock State Park in the Santa Cruz Mountains.

(G) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for acquisition of lands in Santa Clara County within and adjacent to Henry Coe State Park and for lands in Stanislaus County within the park.

(H) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for acquisition of natural lands for expansion of Pescadero Marsh Natural Preserve at Pescadero State Beach.

(I) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for acquisition of land for an East Bay Shoreline State Park in the Counties of Alameda or Contra Costa, or both, generally in accordance with the East Bay Shoreline feasibility study.

(J) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for acquisition of natural
 lands within and adjacent to Mt. Diablo State Park.

(K) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for implementation of the Frank’s Tract State Recreation Area General Plan with first priority given to the western portion, providing secondary wave protection benefits to adjacent islands.

(L) One million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000) for acquisition of wetlands in and adjacent to the Delta Meadows Project.

(M) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for acquisition of natural lands within and adjacent to Robert Louis Stevenson State Park.

(N) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for expansion of Anderson Marsh State Historic Park.

(O) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for expansion of the South
 Yuba Project along the South Fork of the Yuba River to protect scenic vistas and riparian habitat and to provide for recreational trails.

(2) Fifty-four million seven hundred thousand dollars ($54,700,000) for acquisition, development, rehabilitation, or restoration of real property in the state park system in accordance with the following schedule:

(A) Four million seven hundred thousand dollars ($4,700,000) for acquisitions of real property inside the boundaries of existing projects or units or as additions to existing projects or units.

(B) Fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) for development, rehabilitation, or restoration of coastal resources, other than coastal resources in or on San Francisco Bay, in accordance with the following schedule:

(i) Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) within San Diego County through Santa Barbara County.

(ii) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) within San Luis Obispo County through the City and County of San Francisco.

(iii) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) within Marin County through Del Norte County.

(C) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for development, rehabilitation, or restoration of resources in or on San Francisco Bay.

(D) Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) for development, rehabilitation, or restoration of inland resources.

(E) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for development, rehabilitation, or restoration at lakes, reservoirs, and waterways, including the State Water
 Facilities, as defined in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (d) of Section 12934 of the Water Code.

(F) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for the repair of storm damage and construction to prevent future storm damage.

(G) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for planning, development, rehabilitation, restoration, or interpretive facilities in support of volunteer community action projects for the state park system.

(H) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for the increased stewardship of the public investment in the protection of the most critical natural and scenic features of the existing state park system.

(I) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for rehabilitation and restoration of historical resources of the state park system.

(J) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for development and rehabilitation of trails within the state park system or connecting units of the state park system.

(K) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for acquisition and development of trailheads for the Sno-Park program pursuant to Chapter 1.27 (commencing with Section 5091.01) of Division 5, including access to the Tahoe Rim Trail.

(3) One hundred eighty-five million four hundred thousand dollars ($185,400,000) to the Department of Parks and Recreation for grants to local agencies in accordance with the following schedule:

(A) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for a grant to San Diego County in accordance with the following schedule:

(i) Ten
 million dollars ($10,000,000) for acquisition of natural lands in the San Dieguito River Valley.

(ii) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for acquisition of natural lands in the Tijuana River Valley.

(iii) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for acquisition of San Diego County resource conservation areas and urban canyons in accordance with the resource element of the County General Plan.

(B) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for a grant to the City of Laguna Beach for acquisition of, and for grants by the city to nonprofit organizations for acquisition of, natural lands within and contiguous to the Laguna Greenbelt as described in the Orange County General Plan.

(C) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for a grant to the City of Irvine for acquisition of
 natural lands in the open space spine designated in the City of Irvine General Plan.

(D) Eleven million dollars ($11,000,000) for a grant to the City of Riverside in accordance with the following schedule:

(i) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for acquisition of natural lands in Sycamore Canyon Wilderness Park in accordance with the City of Riverside Specific Plan.

(ii) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for acquisition of land in and near the California Citrus State Historic Park located in the Arlington Heights area of Riverside.

(E) Two million four hundred thousand dollars ($2,400,000) for a grant to the County of Riverside in accordance with the following schedule:

(i) Four hundred
 thousand dollars ($400,000) for acquisition of land to expand Hurkey Creek Park.

(ii) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for acquisition of land for trails in the Santa Ana River Corridor.

(iii) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for acquisition of land for trails suitable for equestrian and hiking uses in Riverside County, including the Temescal Canyon Trail.

(F) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for a grant to the County of San Bernardino for acquisition of land primarily through the use of conservation easements within the Chino Agricultural Preserve.

(G) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for a grant to Los Angeles County in accordance with the following schedule:

(i) Ten million
 dollars ($10,000,000) for acquisition or development of noncommercial visitor use and access facilities, and/or renovation of existing facilities at county, state, or city beaches operated by Los Angeles County.

(ii) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for acquisition of land for the Baldwin Hills State Recreation Area in accordance with the general plan for Baldwin Hills State Recreation Area.

(iii) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for acquisition of natural lands to establish the Brea Heights Regional County Park.

(H) Seven million dollars ($7,000,000) for a grant to the County of Santa Barbara for acquisition of natural lands, wildlife habitat, wetlands, and agricultural land preservation, in incorporated and unincorporated areas, in accordance with the following schedule, except that expenditures for
 nonagricultural lands shall be limited to acquisition of lands in the Coastal Zone and shall be of sufficient size to be a major natural or low intensity community recreational resource:

(i) Four million eight hundred thousand dollars ($4,800,000) for nonagricultural lands located south of the ridge line of the Santa Ynez Mountain Range.

(ii) One million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) for nonagricultural lands north of the ridge line of the Santa Ynez Mountain Range.

(iii) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for the preservation of agricultural land in Santa Barbara County as identified for agricultural use in the Santa Barbara County Comprehensive Plan. These funds shall be used primarily for the acquisition of conservation easements.

(I) Four
 million dollars ($4,000,000) for a grant to the County of Monterey for acquisition of conservation easements in Monterey County on agricultural lands in the Salinas and Pajaro Valleys.

(J) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for a grant to the Monterey Peninsula Regional Park District to expand the Garland Ranch Regional Park and for acquisition of natural lands and wildlife and riparian habitat in the Bixby Creek watershed.

(K) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for a grant to the County of Santa Cruz for acquisition of conservation easements in Santa Cruz County on commercially viable agricultural lands in the Pajaro Valley and the coastal terrace north of the City of Santa Cruz, consistent with Section 2.3.1 of the Santa Cruz County General Plan.

(L) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for acquisition of those
 greenbelt lands known as the Pogonip property located in the City of Santa Cruz and the County of Santa Cruz, as defined in the 1979 City of Santa Cruz Greenbelt Ordinance. This acquisition shall be accomplished through grants to the following entities listed in order of priority: (1) the City of Santa Cruz and (2) a park and open-space district or a park and recreation district formed by the local electorate.

(M) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for a grant to the Midpeninsula Regional Open Space District for acquisition in accordance with the following schedule:

(i) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for acquisition of land between property managed by the district and Castle Rock State Park and Portola State Park.

(ii) Nine million dollars ($9,000,000) for expansion of Rancho San Antonio, Sierra Azul, El Sereno, El
 Corte de Madera Creek, and Windy Hill Open Space Preserves and for acquisition of Teague Hill Open Space Preserve.

(N) Thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000) for a grant to the East Bay Regional Park District in accordance with the following schedule:

(i) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for expenditure in accordance with the East Bay Regional Park District Master Plan, for expansion of Morgan Territory Regional Park and Briones Regional Park, acquisitions of natural lands along the Carquinez Straits and on Pleasanton Ridge, and shoreline access and trail acquisitions adjacent to the San Francisco Bay.

(ii) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for acquisition of lands in the southern portion of Walpert Ridge in Hayward in central Alameda County.

(iii) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for expansion of the Carquinez Shoreline Park in Port Costa.

(O) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for a grant to the Marin County Open Space District for acquisition of natural lands on Loma Alta Mountain, Big Rock Ridge, and other wetlands, wildlife habitat, and natural lands in accordance with the Environmental Quality and Open Space Elements of the Marin Countywide Plan. 

(P) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for a grant to the County of Marin for preservation of, and for grants by the county to nonprofit organizations for preservation of agricultural lands in the Marin County coastal zone and inland rural corridor, in accordance with the Marin County Agricultural Land Preservation Program. Funds provided in this subparagraph shall be used primarily to acquire agricultural conservation easements.

(Q) One million six hundred thousand dollars ($1,600,000) for a grant to the City of Mill Valley for acquisition of natural lands on the Northridge and spurs of Mount Tamalpais, in accordance with the Open Space Elements in the Marin Countywide Plan or the Mill Valley General Plan, or both.

(R) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for a grant to the City of Vacaville for acquisition of natural lands along the ridgelands of the Vaca Mountains, Blue Ridge Mountains, and English Hills, including Old Rocky, for a ridgeline park in accordance with the Vacaville City General Plan.

(S) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for a grant to the City of Davis for acquisition of, or for grants from the city to nonprofit organizations for acquisition of, wildlife and riparian habitat, wetlands, and potential wetlands within the 1987 Davis
 General Plan Study Area.

(T) Six million dollars ($6,000,000) for a grant to the County of Sacramento, to be shared by the county with the City of Sacramento on a per capita basis, for acquisition of parklands, wetlands, wildlife habitat, and related greenbelt areas in the county along Morrison Creek, Dry Creek, Snodgrass Slough, Cosumnes River, Laguna Creek, Sacramento River, and American River, consistent with the County Park System Master Plan.

(U) Four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) for a grant to Lake County for acquisition of a county park that provides wildlife habitat, riparian areas, and recreational benefits near Middletown.

(c) Eighty-one million three hundred thousand dollars ($81,300,000) to the Wildlife Conservation Board for programs involving the acquisition of land pursuant to the Wildlife
 Conservation Law of 1947, subject to Section 2625 of the Fish and Game Code and consistent with the purposes of this division, and for grants to local agencies, including an amount not to exceed one million two hundred nineteen thousand five hundred dollars ($1,219,500) for state administrative costs, in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Thirty-eight million dollars ($38,000,000) for projects involving the acquisition, preservation, protection, restoration, enhancement, or development of wetlands for wildfowl and other wildlife habitat, in accordance with the following schedule:

(A) Thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000) for acquisition or restoration of wetlands within or adjacent to (1) the areas subject to the jurisdiction of the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission or (2) the boundaries of historic San Francisco Bay wetlands as designated in the
 1985 United States Fish and Wildlife Service National Wetland Inventory Maps for the San Francisco Bay Area or in subsequent updates with not less than eight million dollars ($8,000,000) for acquisition or restoration of wetlands south of the San Mateo Bridge.

(B) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for wetlands outside the coastal zone as defined in Section 30103 and other than within the area defined in subparagraph (A).

(2) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for acquisition of monarch butterfly habitat.

(3) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for acquisition of riparian habitat that drains into the Pacific Ocean within the Counties of San Diego, Orange, Los Angeles, and Ventura.

(4) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for acquisition of land
 containing Tecate Cypress forest and associated rare species in Coal Canyon in Orange County.

(5) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for acquisition of wildlife habitat and natural lands along the San Joaquin River between Friant Dam and Highway 99 in the Counties of Fresno and Madera.

(6) Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for acquisition of valley oak riparian forest and wetlands along the Mokelumne River near Galt in San Joaquin County.

(7) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for acquisition of wetlands, riparian habitat, vernal pools, and immediately adjacent natural uplands in the vicinity of the Stanislaus, Tuolumne, Merced, and San Joaquin Rivers and their tributaries in Stanislaus, San Joaquin, and Merced Counties for open-space, habitat protection, or riparian restoration.

(8) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for acquisition of riparian habitat along the Sacramento River from Shasta Dam to Collinsville.

(9) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for acquisition of riparian habitat along the Feather River from Oroville to the mouth of the river.

(10) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for acquisition of inland, San Pablo Bay, and coastal wetlands in Sonoma County, including the Laguna de Santa Rosa.

(11) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for acquisition within the Napa Marsh and associated wetlands.

(12) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for acquisition of wildlife habitat in northern Napa County as identified by the Department of Fish and Game.

(13) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for acquisition of sensitive riparian areas, meadows, critical wildlife habitat, and recreation lands in the Hope Valley area just south of Lake Tahoe in Alpine County. Portions of these lands which could provide compatible recreational opportunities may be managed by the Department of Parks and Recreation under an interagency agreement with the Department of Fish and Game.

(14) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for acquisition of old growth redwoods, mixed forest, and wildlife habitat near the town of Whitethorn in the Mattole River watershed in Humboldt and Mendocino Counties.

(d) Fifty-eight million dollars ($58,000,000) to the State Coastal Conservancy pursuant to Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000), consistent with the purposes of this division, for acquisition,
 enhancement, or restoration of natural lands and development of public accessways in coastal areas and the San Francisco Bay region; and for preservation of agriculture in coastal areas, and for grants to local agencies and nonprofit organizations, and for related state administrative costs, in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Thirty-four million dollars ($34,000,000) to the State Coastal Conservancy for acquisition, enhancement, or restoration of natural lands, and development of public accessways in coastal areas and the San Francisco Bay region; and for preservation of agriculture in coastal areas, pursuant to Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000). These funds include the five million eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($5,850,000) advanced by the Coastal Conservancy to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for the Circle X acquisition in the Santa Monica Mountains. Up to one million five hundred thousand dollars
 ($1,500,000) of the total funds available pursuant to this paragraph shall be spent on expansion of the Bolsa Chica Linear Park in Orange County or for disbursement to the City of Huntington Beach or other appropriate agencies for this purpose, or for restoration, enhancement, or expansion of the Bolsa Chica wetlands that is not otherwise required for mitigation, or both. Up to four million dollars ($4,000,000) of the total funds available pursuant to this paragraph shall be spent for the purposes of paragraph (2) if the funds allocated in paragraph (2) prove to be insufficient to achieve the purposes of that paragraph.

(2) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for acquisition of natural lands to preserve coastal resources in the coastal dunes and wetlands from Mussel Point to Grover City west of Highway 1 in San Luis Obispo and Santa Barbara Counties. Up to seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) may be spent for dunes restoration and
 public access consistent with coastal resources preservation.

(3) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) for acquisition of coastal natural lands and wetlands in Monterey County between Monterey Wharf #2 and the Salinas River.

(4) Eight million dollars ($8,000,000) for acquisition of, and for grants to public agencies or nonprofit organizations for acquisition of, coastal lands within San Mateo County that meet three or more of the following criteria, with preference given to lands meeting the largest number of criteria: (1) ocean frontage, (2) state or county scenic corridor, (3) designated in the County General Plan as agriculture, (4) sensitive habitat areas or wetlands, (5) close proximity to urban areas, or (6) adjacent to other permanently dedicated public or private natural lands. These funds shall not be used for urban waterfronts or for lot consolidation
 projects as defined in Chapters 5 (commencing with Section 31200) and 7 (commencing with Section 31300) of Division 21.

(5) Four million dollars ($4,000,000) for acquisitions in Sonoma County of coastal natural lands and coastal wetlands south of Stewart Point, and for acquisition of San Pablo Bay wetlands and natural lands.

(6) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for acquisition of, and for grants to nonprofit organizations for acquisition of, land containing old growth Douglas fir on Mill Creek, a tributary of the Mattole River in Humboldt County, and for public access to the lands acquired.

(e) Eighty-two million dollars ($82,000,000) to the following agencies, and for grants to local agencies and nonprofit organizations, including state administrative costs, for the following purposes:

(1) Seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000) to the Department of Fish and Game, including an amount not to exceed two hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($255,000) for state administrative costs, in accordance with the following schedule:

(A) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for restoration and enhancement of salmon streams in accordance with the recommendations of the Commercial Salmon Stamp Advisory Committee and the Advisory Committee on Salmon and Steelhead Trout.

(B) Six million dollars ($6,000,000) for restoration and enhancement of wild trout and native steelhead habitat; for capital outlay to design, develop, and construct an experimental wild trout and native steelhead propagation facility; for acquisition of land important for the perpetuation of wild trout and native steelhead; and to provide public access
 to wild trout and native steelhead waters.

(C) One million dollars ($1,000,000) for marine patrol boats and other equipment for enforcement of fish and game regulations to protect fish, marine birds, and marine mammals from Point Conception to Fort Bragg.

(2) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) to the Department of Forestry for urban forestry programs, and for related state administrative costs not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), in accordance with Section 4799.12. 

(3) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) to the Department of Water Resources for grants to counties, cities, cities and counties, districts, and nonprofit organizations for the acquisition or restoration of natural lands which contain urban streams, creeks, and riparian areas, and for related state administrative costs not to exceed
 two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), in accordance with Section 7048 of the Water Code.

(4) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for land acquisition and for grants to nonprofit organizations for land acquisition in the Santa Monica Mountains, and for related state administrative costs, pursuant to Division 23 (commencing with Section 33000) and consistent with the purposes of this division. Five million dollars ($5,000,000) of this amount shall be for grants to nonprofit organizations pursuant to Section 33204.2.

(5) Twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) to the County of Monterey to be transferred directly to the 1988 Bond Act Account of the Big Sur Preservation Fund of Monterey County to support implementation of “critical viewshed” policies of the county’s Big Sur Coast Land Use Plan which was certified by the California
 Coastal Commission on April 9, 1986, as a component of the Big Sur Local Coastal Program.

The intent of this paragraph is to ensure that the exceptional vistas seen from Scenic Highway One along the Big Sur Coast in Monterey County will be preserved in a manner that ensures the continuation of existing state and local jurisdiction over the Big Sur area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1251, Sec. 1.   Effective October 11, 1993.   Note: This section was added on June 7, 1988, by initiative Prop. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5907.5.

(a) Pursuant to Section 5922, for the purpose of expending funds appropriated to the department in Item 3790-101-0786 of the Budget Act of 2014, and reappropriated in Item 3790-490 of the Budget Act of 2017, funds shall be available to the County of San Diego for the development, improvement, rehabilitation, protection, and
 restoration
 of natural and park lands in the Tijuana River Valley, for the studies described in subdivision (b), and for the development of a campground planned for the Tijuana River Valley, as described in the “Tijuana River Valley Regional Park Public Use Feasibility Study.”

(b) Up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of the moneys appropriated to the department and available to the County of San Diego, described in subdivision (a), shall be used to update or conduct, as the case may be, the following studies:

(1) An update to the Tijuana River Valley Recovery Team’s
 “Recovery Strategy: Living with the Water,” January 2012 to include issues related to wastewater and runoff.

(2) A study focused on the improvement and protection of natural lands, including the main river channel, in the Tijuana River Valley.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   (SB 507)   Effective October 6, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Miscellaneous Provisions [5910. - 5929.]

5910.

(a) The grant funds authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5907 shall be allocated to counties, cities, cities and counties, and districts on the basis of their populations, as determined by the Department of Parks and Recreation in cooperation with the Department of Finance, on the basis of the most recent verifiable census data and other population data as the Department of Parks and Recreation may require to be furnished by any county,
 city, city and county, or district.

(b) Forty percent of the total funds available for grants shall be allocated to counties and regional park, open-space, or park and open-space districts formed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500). Each county’s allocation shall be in the same ratio as the county’s population is to the state’s total population, except that each county is entitled to a minimum allocation of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). In any county that embraces all or part of the territory of a regional park, open-space, or park and open-space district whose board of directors is not the county board of supervisors, the amount allocated to the county shall be apportioned between the regional district and the county in proportion to the population of the county that is included within the territory of the regional district and the population of the county that is outside the territory of the regional district.

(c) (1) Sixty percent of the total funds available for grants shall be allocated to cities and districts, other than regional park, open-space, or park and open-space districts. Each city’s and each district’s allocation shall be in the same ratio as the city’s or district’s population is to the combined total of the state’s population that is included in incorporated areas and in unincorporated areas within the districts, except that each city or district is entitled to a minimum allocation of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). In any instance in which the boundary of a city overlaps the boundary of a district, the population in the area of overlapping jurisdictions shall be attributed to each jurisdiction in proportion to the extent to which each operates and manages parks and recreational areas and facilities for that population. In any instance in which the boundary of a city overlaps the boundary of a district, and in
 the area of overlap the city does not operate and manage parks and recreational areas and facilities, all grant funds shall be allocated to the district.

(2) Each city and district whose boundaries overlap shall develop a specific plan for allocating the grant funds in accordance with the formula specified in paragraph (1). If by October 1, 1990, the plan has not been agreed to by the affected jurisdictions and submitted to the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Director of Parks and Recreation shall determine the allocation of the grant funds among the affected jurisdictions.

(d) Individual application for grants pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5907 shall be submitted to the Department of Parks and Recreation for approval as to conformity with the requirements of this division. The application shall be accompanied by certification from the planning agency of the
 applicant that the project for which the grant is applied is consistent with the park and recreation element of the applicable city or county general plan or the district park and recreation plan and will satisfy a high priority need. In order to utilize available grant funds as effectively as possible, overlapping or adjoining jurisdictions are encouraged to combine projects and submit a joint application.

(e) The minimum amount that the applicant may request for any individual project is twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). Any agency may allocate all or a portion of its per capita share for a regional or state project.

(f) The Director of Parks and Recreation shall annually forward a statement of the total amount to be appropriated in each fiscal year for projects approved for grants pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5907 to the Director of Finance for inclusion in the
 Budget Bill. The amount of grant funds to be allocated to each eligible jurisdiction shall be published in the Governor’s Budget for the fiscal year in which the appropriation for those grants is to be made and, as soon as possible thereafter, a list of projects for which grants have been approved shall be made available by the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(g) Funds appropriated for grants pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5907 shall be encumbered by the recipient within three years of the date when the appropriation became effective, regardless of the date when each project was approved pursuant to this section. Commencing with the Budget Bill for the 1992–93 fiscal year, any grant funds authorized under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5907 that were not accepted by the recipient, or were not encumbered by the recipient within that three-year period, are available for appropriation for one or more of the
 classes of expenditures specified in Section 5907 that the Legislature deems to be of the highest priority statewide.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5911.

Funds authorized in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5907 may be expended for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, or restoration of parks, beaches, open-space lands, recreational trails, or recreational facilities and areas, and for development rights or scenic easements in connection with those acquisitions. After at least one public hearing, the Director of Parks and Recreation shall prepare and adopt criteria and procedures for evaluating those competitive grants.
 The minimum amount that the applicant may request for any individual project is twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5912.

The funds authorized in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 5907 shall be available as grants on a competitive basis to cities, counties, cities and counties, districts, and nonprofit organizations and shall be encumbered by the recipient within three years of the date when the appropriation became effective. The Director of Parks and Recreation, through the Office of Historic Preservation, shall prepare and adopt criteria and procedures for evaluating those competitive grants.
 An individual jurisdiction may enter into an agreement with a nonprofit organization for the purpose of carrying out a grant, subject to the requirements of Section 5917.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5913.

The funds authorized in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 5907 shall be available as grants on a competitive basis to local units of government, and nonprofit organizations authorized to provide park, recreation, or open-space services or facilities to the general public. The Director of Parks and Recreation shall prepare and adopt criteria and procedures for evaluating those competitive grants for trail development.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5914.

An application for a grant pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 5907 shall be submitted to the Director of Parks and Recreation for review and approval; an application for a grant pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5907 shall be submitted to the Director of the State Coastal Conservancy for review and approval; an application for a grant pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 5907 shall be submitted to the Director of Fish and Game for review and approval;
 an application for a grant pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 5907 shall be submitted to the Director of Forestry for review and approval; an application for a grant pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 5907 shall be submitted to the Director of Water Resources for review and approval; and an application for a grant pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (e) of Section 5907 shall be submitted to the Director of the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for review and approval.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5915.

(a) Any member of the Legislature, the State Park and Recreation Commission, the California Coastal Commission, or the Secretary of the Resources Agency may nominate any project to be funded under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5907 for study by the Department of Parks and Recreation. The State Park and Recreation Commission shall nominate projects after holding at least one public hearing to seek project proposals from individuals, citizen groups, the
 Department of Parks and Recreation, and other public agencies. Any of the commissions shall make nominations by vote of its membership.

(b) The Department of Parks and Recreation shall study any project so nominated. In addition to the procedures required by Section 5006, the Department of Parks and Recreation shall submit to the Legislature and to the Secretary of the Resources Agency a report consisting of a priority listing and comparative evaluation of all projects nominated for study not later than March 1, 1989.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5915.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “City” means the City of Davis.

(2) “Parcel” means one of the following parcels acquired by the city with a grant made pursuant to subparagraph (S) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 5907, as identified by the assessor of the County of Yolo:

(A) 033-260-004.

(B) 033-260-005.

(C) 033-260-010.

(D) 033-130-031.

(E) 033-130-052.

(F) 033-130-035.

(G) 033-130-037.

(H) 033-130-051.

(3) “Plan” means the “Yolo Habitat Conservation Plan/Natural Community Conservation Plan.”

(b) Consistent with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5919, the city may convey a conservation easement, lease, or license for any of the following purposes:

(1) A habitat conservation project that is consistent with the plan and located on a parcel.

(2) (A) The geologic storage of carbon dioxide in the pore spaces in the geologic reservoir located below a parcel specified in subparagraphs (F) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(B) A monitoring well or any other equipment or facility that is required by federal, state, or local law for the geologic storage of carbon dioxide, as described in subparagraph (A), and that is located on a parcel specified in subparagraphs (F) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(C) Subdivision (b) of Section 5919 applies to any change to the use of the surface of a parcel specified in subparagraphs (F) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(D) This paragraph does not authorize the injection of carbon dioxide into a geologic reservoir located below a parcel specified in subparagraphs (F) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) from an injection point located on the surface of a parcel specified in subparagraphs (F) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(3) An agricultural activity that provides wildlife habitat, consistent with the plan, and is located on a parcel.

(c) Any revenue received by the city from conveying a conservation easement, lease, or license on a parcel, as authorized pursuant to this section, shall be used to preserve, protect, maintain, or enhance wildlife and riparian habitat, wetlands, and potential wetlands within the Davis
 Planning Area, consistent with this division.

(d) In the conveyance of an easement, lease, or license pursuant to subdivision (b), the city shall maintain the scenic, recreational, and wildlife values of that real property.

(e) This section does not exempt the city or any other party from any law that would otherwise apply to the conveyance of a conservation easement, lease, or license pursuant to subdivision (b) or to a project or activity described in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.   (SB 256)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5916.

(a) Acquisition of real property for the state park system by purchase or by eminent domain shall be under the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) Work efforts for stewardship purposes pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5907 may include, but are not limited to, objectives such as
 the control of major erosion and geologic hazards, the restoration and improvement of critical plant and animal habitat, the control and elimination of exotic species encroachment, the stabilization of coastal dunes and bluffs, and the planning necessary to implement those activities. Those efforts may not include activities which merely supplement park system operations or which are usually funded from other sources.

(History: Added June 7, 1988, by initiative Proposition 70.)
-------------------------------------------

5917.
